District of Columbia statutes.
38-1803.13

Administrative provisions.

The World Class Schools Task Force shall ensure public access to its proceedings (other than proceedings, or portions of proceedings, relating to internal personnel and management matters) that are relevant to its duties under this subchapter and shall make available to the public, at reasonable cost, transcripts of such proceedings.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [255], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2313

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.33.